Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,210
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish and maintain a procedure to set off against a debtor's state income tax refund any debt owed to the Department of Motor Vehicles which has accrued as a result of an individual's liability for motor fuel taxes pursuant to section 66-1405.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 25.